Nebraska, session 109, LB1024.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1024 LB1024
2026 2026
Section 1. Beginning with school year 2027-28, each school
district, in consultation with the State Department of Education, shall
include instruction on the history of communism within the social studies
curriculum. Such instruction shall be age-appropriate and include:
(a) The history of communism in the United States, including
domestic communist movements and their associated histories and tactics;
(b) Atrocities committed in foreign countries in the name of
communism;
(c) Comparative discussion of political ideologies, such as
communism and totalitarianism, that conflict with the principles of
freedom and democracy essential to the founding principles of the United
States' representative republic system;
(d) The increasing threat of communism in the United States and its
allies through the 20th century, the events of the Cultural Revolution in
the People's Republic of China, the history of the Soviet Union, and the
mass killings that have occurred under communist regimes;
(e) The suppression and persecution of various religious faiths
under communist regimes; and
(f) The economic, industrial, and political events that have
preceded communist revolutions.
Sec. 2. Section 79-724, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-724 It is the responsibility of society to ensure that youth are
given the opportunity to become competent, responsible, patriotic, and
civil citizens to ensure a strong, stable, just, and prosperous America.
Such a citizenry necessitates that every member thereof be knowledgeable
of our nation's history, government, geography, and economic system. The
youth in our state should be committed to the ideals and values of our
country's democracy and the constitutional republic established by the
people. Schools should help prepare our youth to make informed and
reasoned decisions for the public good. Civic competence is necessary to
-2-

LB1024 LB1024
2026 2026
sustain and improve our democratic way of life and must be taught in all
public, private, denominational, and parochial schools. A central role of
schools is to impart civic knowledge and skills that help our youth to
see the relevance of a civic dimension for their lives. Students should
be made fully aware of the liberties, opportunities, and advantages we
possess and the sacrifices and struggles of those through whose efforts
these benefits were gained. Since young people are most susceptible to
the acceptance of principles and doctrines that will influence them
throughout their lives, it is one of the first duties of our educational
system to conduct its activities, choose its textbooks, and arrange its
curriculum in such a way that the youth of our state have the opportunity
to become competent, responsible, patriotic, and civil American citizens.
(1) The school board of each school district shall, at the beginning
of each calendar year, appoint from its members a committee of three, to
be known as the committee on American civics, which shall:
(a) Hold no fewer than two public meetings annually, at least one
when public testimony is accepted;
(b) Keep minutes of each meeting showing the time and place of the
meeting, which members were present or absent, and the substance and
details of all matters discussed;
(c) Examine and ensure that the social studies curriculum used in
the district is aligned with section 1 of this act and the social studies
standards adopted pursuant to section 79-760.01 and teaches foundational
knowledge in civics, history, economics, financial literacy, and
geography;
(d) Review and approve the social studies curriculum to ensure that
it stresses the services of the men and women who played a crucial role
in the achievement of national independence, establishment of our
constitutional government, and preservation of the union and includes the
incorporation of multicultural education as set forth in sections 79-719
to 79-723 in order to instill a pride and respect for the nation's
-3-

LB1024 LB1024
2026 2026
institutions and not be merely a recital of events and dates;
(e) Ensure that any curriculum recommended or approved by the
committee on American civics is made readily accessible to the public and
contains a reference to this section;
(f) Ensure that the district develops and utilizes formative,
interim, and summative assessments to measure student mastery of the
social studies standards adopted pursuant to section 79-760.01;
(g) Ensure that the social studies curriculum in the district
incorporates one or more of the following for each student:
(i) Administration of a written test that is identical to the entire
civics portion of the naturalization test used by United States
Citizenship and Immigration Services prior to the completion of eighth
grade and again prior to the completion of twelfth grade with the
individual score from each test for each student made available to a
parent or guardian of such student; or
(ii) Attendance or participation between the commencement of eighth
grade and completion of twelfth grade in a meeting of a public body as
defined by section 84-1409 followed by the completion of a project or
paper in which each student demonstrates or discusses the personal
learning experience of such student related to such attendance or
participation; or
(iii) Completion of a project or paper and a class presentation
between the commencement of eighth grade and the completion of twelfth
grade on a person or persons or an event commemorated by a holiday listed
in subdivision (6) of this section or on a topic related to such person
or persons or event; and
(h) Take all such other steps as will assure the carrying out of the
provisions of this section and provide a report to the school board
regarding the committee's findings and recommendations.
(2) All social studies courses approved for grade levels as provided
by this section shall include and adequately stress contributions of all
-4-

LB1024 LB1024
2026 2026
ethnic groups to (a) the development and growth of America into a great
nation, (b) art, music, education, medicine, literature, science,
politics, and government, and (c) the military in all of this nation's
wars.
(3) All grades of all public, private, denominational, and parochial
schools, below the sixth grade, shall devote at least one hour per week
to exercises or teaching periods for the following purpose:
(a) The discussion of noteworthy events pertaining to American
history or the exceptional acts of individuals and groups of Americans;
(b) The historical background, memorization, and singing of
patriotic songs such as the Star-Spangled Banner and America the
Beautiful;
(c) The development of respect for the American flag as a symbol of
freedom and the sacrifices of those who secured that freedom; and
(d) Instruction as to proper conduct in the presentation of the
American flag.
(4) In at least two of the three grades from the fifth grade to the
eighth grade in all public, private, denominational, and parochial
schools, time shall be set aside for the teaching of American history
from the social studies curriculum, which shall be taught in such a
manner that all students are given the opportunity to (a) become
competent, responsible, patriotic, and civil citizens who possess a deep
understanding of and respect for both the Constitution of the United
States and the Constitution of Nebraska and (b) prepare to preserve,
protect, and defend freedom and democracy in our nation and our world.
(5) In at least two courses in every high school, time shall be
devoted to the teaching of civics and American history as outlined in the
social studies standards adopted pursuant to section 79-760.01, during
which specific attention shall be given to the following matters:
(a) The Declaration of Independence, the United States Constitution,
the Constitution of Nebraska, and the structure and function of local
-5-

LB1024 LB1024
2026 2026
government in this state;
(b) The benefits and advantages of representative government, the
rights and responsibilities of citizenship in our government, and the
dangers and fallacies of forms of government that restrict individual
freedoms or possess antidemocratic ideals such as, but not limited to,
Nazism and communism;
(c) The duties of citizenship, which include active participation in
the improvement of a citizen's community, state, country, and world and
the value and practice of civil discourse between opposing interests; and
(d) The application of knowledge in civics, history, economics,
financial literacy, and geography to address societal issues.
(6) Appropriate patriotic exercises suitable to the occasion shall
be held under the direction of the superintendent in every public,
private, denominational, and parochial school on George Washington's
birthday, Abraham Lincoln's birthday, Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr.'s
birthday, Native American Heritage Day, Constitution Day, Memorial Day,
Veterans Day, and Thanksgiving Day, or on the day or week preceding or
following such holiday, if the school is in session.
(7) Every school board, the State Board of Education, and the
superintendent of each school district in the state shall be held
directly responsible in the order named for carrying out this section.
Neglect thereof by any employee may be considered a cause for dismissal.
Sec. 3. Section 79-760.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-760.01 (1) The State Board of Education shall adopt measurable
academic content standards for at least the grade levels required for
statewide assessment pursuant to section 79-760.03. The standards shall
cover the subject areas of reading, writing, mathematics, science, and
social studies.
(2)(a) The board shall also adopt measurable academic content
standards for the following as part of the social studies standards:
-6-

LB1024 LB1024
2026 2026
(i) Financial literacy; and
(ii) Education on the Holocaust and other acts of genocide as
recognized by the Congress of the United States or the United Nations as
of January 1, 2022; and .
(iii) On or before January 1, 2027, instruction on the history of
communism as require pursuant to section 1 of this act.
(b) On or before March 1, 2024, the board shall also adopt
measurable academic content standards for computer science and technology
education under the mathematics, science, or career and technical
education standards.
(3) Academic content standards adopted or recommended pursuant to
this section shall be sufficiently clear and measurable to be used for
testing student performance with respect to mastery of the content
described in the state standards.
(4) The State Board of Education shall develop a plan to review and
update standards for each subject area every seven years. The state board
plan shall include a review of commonly accepted standards adopted by
school districts.
Sec. 4. Original sections 79-724 and 79-760.01, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-7-